src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! The TATAR language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_
 +N: px   ;
 +N: NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_АП
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>лар px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ны  px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ның px ;
 +N+Loc:%>та  px ;
 +N+Abl:%>тан px ;
 +N+Dir:%>ка  px ;

LEXICON px
               # ; ! without px
 +PxSg1:%>ым   # ;
 +PxSg2:%>ың   # ;
 +PxSg3:%>ы    # ;
 +PxPl1:%>ыбыз # ;
 +PxPl2:%>ыгыз # ;
 +PxPl3:%>ы    # ;

LEXICON NMN_
 +TYÄ+Sg+Nom: K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
