src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
аваздашлык+N:аваздашлык N_  "" ;
авыз+N:авыз N_  "" ;
агарткыч+N:агарткыч N_  "" ;
агыш+N:агыш N_  "" ;
аждаһа+N:аждаһа N_  "" ;
азәрбайҗан% хатыны% (кызы)+N:азәрбайҗан% хатыны% (кызы) N_  "" ;
аккүбәләк+N:аккүбәләк N_  "" ;
актыгы+N:актыгы N_  "" ;
алабуга+N:алабуга N_  "" ;
алдакчы+N:алдакчы N_  "" ;
алмагач+N:алмагач N_  "" ;
алшарт+N:алшарт N_  "" ;
анар% агачы+N:анар% агачы N_  "" ;
арадаш+N:арадаш N_  "" ;
аркан+N:аркан N_  "" ;
арулык+N:арулык N_  "" ;
асатлык+N:асатлык N_  "" ;
ат+N:ат N_  "" ;
атасызлык+N:атасызлык N_  "" ;
ахирәт+N:ахирәт N_  "" ;
аш+N:аш N_  "" ;
ашханә+N:ашханә N_  "" ;
аң+N:аң N_  "" ;
баба% кош+N:баба% кош N_  "" ;
байгыш+N:байгыш N_  "" ;
бакча% кайчысы+N:бакча% кайчысы N_  "" ;
балалар+N:балалар N_  "" ;
баллы% баба+N:баллы% баба N_  "" ;
бандитлык+N:бандитлык N_  "" ;
басу+N:басу N_  "" ;
башбаштаклык+N:башбаштаклык N_  "" ;
баҗа+N:баҗа N_  "" ;
беләк+N:беләк N_  "" ;
берләшмә+N:берләшмә N_  "" ;
бикә+N:бикә N_  "" ;
бирнә+N:бирнә N_  "" ;
бишлек+N:бишлек N_  "" ;
бозау+N:бозау N_  "" ;
болдыр+N:болдыр N_  "" ;
борын% тишеге+N:борын% тишеге N_  "" ;
буа+N:буа N_  "" ;
бума+N:бума N_  "" ;
бурыч+N:бурыч N_  "" ;
былбыл+N:былбыл N_  "" ;
бүлендек+N:бүлендек N_  "" ;
бүрәнкә+N:бүрәнкә N_  "" ;
бәдән+N:бәдән N_  "" ;
бәйсезлек+N:бәйсезлек N_  "" ;
бәртәс+N:бәртәс N_  "" ;
бәян+N:бәян N_  "" ;
бөркет+N:бөркет N_  "" ;
бөят+N:бөят N_  "" ;
вакыйга+N:вакыйга N_  "" ;
ватык+N:ватык N_  "" ;
вәкарьлек+N:вәкарьлек N_  "" ;
гадәт+N:гадәт N_  "" ;
гайбәтче+N:гайбәтче N_  "" ;
гарип+N:гарип N_  "" ;
гаярьлек+N:гаярьлек N_  "" ;
гыйбарә+N:гыйбарә N_  "" ;
гәүдәләнеш+N:гәүдәләнеш N_  "" ;
гөмбә+N:гөмбә N_  "" ;
гөсләче+N:гөсләче N_  "" ;
дастанчы+N:дастанчы N_  "" ;
димче+N:димче N_  "" ;
диңгез+N:диңгез N_  "" ;
думбрачы+N:думбрачы N_  "" ;
дүләнә% күбәләге+N:дүләнә% күбәләге N_  "" ;
дәлилсезлек+N:дәлилсезлек N_  "" ;
дәү% әти+N:дәү% әти N_  "" ;
егәр+N:егәр N_  "" ;
елдырым+N:елдырым N_  "" ;
ерым+N:ерым N_  "" ;
зар+N:зар N_  "" ;
зифалык+N:зифалык N_  "" ;
зәйтүн% гөле+N:зәйтүн% гөле N_  "" ;
иген% коңгызы+N:иген% коңгызы N_  "" ;
идән+N:идән N_  "" ;
икетеллелек+N:икетеллелек N_  "" ;
илаһилык+N:илаһилык N_  "" ;
иләмтек+N:иләмтек N_  "" ;
имза+N:имза N_  "" ;
инеш+N:инеш N_  "" ;
иптәшлек+N:иптәшлек N_  "" ;
иркәлек+N:иркәлек N_  "" ;
исемлек+N:исемлек N_  "" ;
испан% хатыны% (кызы)+N:испан% хатыны% (кызы) N_  "" ;
итальян% хатыны% (кызы)+N:итальян% хатыны% (кызы) N_  "" ;
иш+N:иш N_  "" ;
ишәк% колак+N:ишәк% колак N_  "" ;
иңкүлек+N:иңкүлек N_  "" ;
йокычанлык+N:йокычанлык N_  "" ;
йомшак+N:йомшак N_  "" ;
йонча+N:йонча N_  "" ;
йөз+N:йөз N_  "" ;
йөк+N:йөк N_  "" ;
кабакчы+N:кабакчы N_  "" ;
кабилият+N:кабилият N_  "" ;
кавын-карбыз+N:кавын-карбыз N_  "" ;
кадимчелек+N:кадимчелек N_  "" ;
каенсеңел+N:каенсеңел N_  "" ;
казанлы+N:казанлы N_  "" ;
кайгыртучанлык+N:кайгыртучанлык N_  "" ;
кайтаргыч+N:кайтаргыч N_  "" ;
калкавыч+N:калкавыч N_  "" ;
кальга+N:кальга N_  "" ;
камыр% агачы+N:камыр% агачы N_  "" ;
канәгатьсезлек+N:канәгатьсезлек N_  "" ;
капу+N:капу N_  "" ;
каравылчы+N:каравылчы N_  "" ;
каракүл+N:каракүл N_  "" ;
карачкы+N:карачкы N_  "" ;
кари(э)+N:кари(э) N_  "" ;
карыгу+N:карыгу N_  "" ;
катгыйлык+N:катгыйлык N_  "" ;
катыргы+N:катыргы N_  "" ;
кашкарый+N:кашкарый N_  "" ;
келәт+N:келәт N_  "" ;
кершән+N:кершән N_  "" ;
кеше-мазар+N:кеше-мазар N_  "" ;
кием-салым+N:кием-салым N_  "" ;
килен+N:килен N_  "" ;
кимлек+N:кимлек N_  "" ;
кирпеч+N:кирпеч N_  "" ;
кисемтә+N:кисемтә N_  "" ;
китап+N:китап N_  "" ;
кишәрлек+N:кишәрлек N_  "" ;
кодрәтлелек+N:кодрәтлелек N_  "" ;
колан+N:колан N_  "" ;
комач+N:комач N_  "" ;
корал+N:корал N_  "" ;
корчаңгы+N:корчаңгы N_  "" ;
коткычы+N:коткычы N_  "" ;
кояш+N:кояш N_  "" ;
кузак+N:кузак N_  "" ;
култамга+N:култамга N_  "" ;
купшылык+N:купшылык N_  "" ;
курыс+N:курыс N_  "" ;
кушылма+N:кушылма N_  "" ;
куәтсезлек+N:куәтсезлек N_  "" ;
кызтәкә+N:кызтәкә N_  "" ;
кыйбланамә+N:кыйбланамә N_  "" ;
кылчык+N:кылчык N_  "" ;
кыргыч+N:кыргыч N_  "" ;
кырынгыч+N:кырынгыч N_  "" ;
кысым+N:кысым N_  "" ;
кыш+N:кыш N_  "" ;
кяфер+N:кяфер N_  "" ;
күз% карасы+N:күз% карасы N_  "" ;
күкерт+N:күкерт N_  "" ;
күлмәк+N:күлмәк N_  "" ;
күндәмлек+N:күндәмлек N_  "" ;
күпләр+N:күпләр N_  "" ;
күркә+N:күркә N_  "" ;
күсе+N:күсе N_  "" ;
күчәр+N:күчәр N_  "" ;
кәефлелек+N:кәефлелек N_  "" ;
кәмә+N:кәмә N_  "" ;
кәрәз+N:кәрәз N_  "" ;
кәшәкә+N:кәшәкә N_  "" ;
көй+N:көй N_  "" ;
көләчлек+N:көләчлек N_  "" ;
көнчыгыш+N:көнчыгыш N_  "" ;
көрәк+N:көрәк N_  "" ;
көчләүче+N:көчләүче N_  "" ;
лачын+N:лачын N_  "" ;
ләтчә+N:ләтчә N_  "" ;
маймыл+N:маймыл N_  "" ;
малайлык+N:малайлык N_  "" ;
матча+N:матча N_  "" ;
меңче+N:меңче N_  "" ;
мирас+N:мирас N_  "" ;
морҗа+N:морҗа N_  "" ;
мыгырдык+N:мыгырдык N_  "" ;
мәгърифәтче+N:мәгърифәтче N_  "" ;
мәктәп+N:мәктәп N_  "" ;
мәсләк+N:мәсләк N_  "" ;
мәңгелек+N:мәңгелек N_  "" ;
мөшкеллек+N:мөшкеллек N_  "" ;
наянлык+N:наянлык N_  "" ;
нугай+N:нугай N_  "" ;
нәсел+N:нәсел N_  "" ;
нәүбәт+N:нәүбәт N_  "" ;
озынлык+N:озынлык N_  "" ;
онык+N:онык N_  "" ;
остазлык+N:остазлык N_  "" ;
очсызлык+N:очсызлык N_  "" ;
парландыргыч+N:парландыргыч N_  "" ;
пешкәк+N:пешкәк N_  "" ;
прәннек+N:прәннек N_  "" ;
пәнҗешәмбе+N:пәнҗешәмбе N_  "" ;
ризалык+N:ризалык N_  "" ;
рәвеш+N:рәвеш N_  "" ;
рәхимсезлек+N:рәхимсезлек N_  "" ;
савап+N:савап N_  "" ;
саилче+N:саилче N_  "" ;
саклык+N:саклык N_  "" ;
салу+N:салу N_  "" ;
сантый+N:сантый N_  "" ;
сасык+N:сасык N_  "" ;
селтәнеш,% селтәнү+N:селтәнеш,% селтәнү N_  "" ;
сигезлек+N:сигезлек N_  "" ;
сипкеч+N:сипкеч N_  "" ;
солыбаш+N:солыбаш N_  "" ;
суганча+N:суганча N_  "" ;
сукуыш+N:сукуыш N_  "" ;
сусаклагыч+N:сусаклагыч N_  "" ;
суүсем+N:суүсем N_  "" ;
сызлавык+N:сызлавык N_  "" ;
сыкы+N:сыкы N_  "" ;
сырынты+N:сырынты N_  "" ;
сәбәпче+N:сәбәпче N_  "" ;
сәнгатьче+N:сәнгатьче N_  "" ;
сәяхәтче+N:сәяхәтче N_  "" ;
сөйләүче+N:сөйләүче N_  "" ;
сөрем+N:сөрем N_  "" ;
сөяк-санак+N:сөяк-санак N_  "" ;
табут+N:табут N_  "" ;
таган+N:таган N_  "" ;
такыя+N:такыя N_  "" ;
талтирәк+N:талтирәк N_  "" ;
тана+N:тана N_  "" ;
таратучы+N:таратучы N_  "" ;
тартмачы+N:тартмачы N_  "" ;
татар+N:татар N_  "" ;
ташкурчак+N:ташкурчак N_  "" ;
тегермән+N:тегермән N_  "" ;
теләнче+N:теләнче N_  "" ;
тетрәвек+N:тетрәвек N_  "" ;
тизәйткеч+N:тизәйткеч N_  "" ;
тимсах+N:тимсах N_  "" ;
тирәк+N:тирәк N_  "" ;
токмач+N:токмач N_  "" ;
торлак+N:торлак N_  "" ;
тоткын+N:тоткын N_  "" ;
тубал+N:тубал N_  "" ;
тузбаш+N:тузбаш N_  "" ;
тулма+N:тулма N_  "" ;
тут+N:тут N_  "" ;
тырма+N:тырма N_  "" ;
түләүче+N:түләүче N_  "" ;
тәкать+N:тәкать N_  "" ;
тәрбия+N:тәрбия N_  "" ;
тәҗрибәсезлек+N:тәҗрибәсезлек N_  "" ;
төкселек+N:төкселек N_  "" ;
төрмәче+N:төрмәче N_  "" ;
уелыш+N:уелыш N_  "" ;
укыган% пр,+N:укыган% пр, N_  "" ;
урманлык+N:урманлык N_  "" ;
утрау+N:утрау N_  "" ;
фал+N:фал N_  "" ;
форсат+N:форсат N_  "" ;
хак% V+N:хак% V N_  "" ;
хикәя+N:хикәя N_  "" ;
хәбәр+N:хәбәр N_  "" ;
хәтер+N:хәтер N_  "" ;
чалбар+N:чалбар N_  "" ;
чатма+N:чатма N_  "" ;
чигеш+N:чигеш N_  "" ;
читек+N:читек N_  "" ;
чуерташ+N:чуерташ N_  "" ;
чыгыр+N:чыгыр N_  "" ;
чүлмәк+N:чүлмәк N_  "" ;
чәкән+N:чәкән N_  "" ;
шакшылык+N:шакшылык N_  "" ;
шешә+N:шешә N_  "" ;
шулпа+N:шулпа N_  "" ;
шәһәр+N:шәһәр N_  "" ;
ыруг+N:ыруг N_  "" ;
эзкуар+N:эзкуар N_  "" ;
эскәтер+N:эскәтер N_  "" ;
эшсез+N:эшсез N_  "" ;
юлсызлык+N:юлсызлык N_  "" ;
ябынча+N:ябынча N_  "" ;
якынлык+N:якынлык N_  "" ;
яманлык+N:яманлык N_  "" ;
яралыш+N:яралыш N_  "" ;
ярышучы+N:ярышучы N_  "" ;
яшьләр+N:яшьләр N_  "" ;
җанлылык+N:җанлылык N_  "" ;
җикән,% җикәнбаш+N:җикән,% җикәнбаш N_  "" ;
җимешчелек+N:җимешчелек N_  "" ;
җиңги,% җиңгә(й)+N:җиңги,% җиңгә(й) N_  "" ;
җәбер+N:җәбер N_  "" ;
җәһәннәм+N:җәһәннәм N_  "" ;
үзсүзлелек+N:үзсүзлелек N_  "" ;
үрдәкборын+N:үрдәкборын N_  "" ;
үңәч+N:үңәч N_  "" ;
әвенлек+N:әвенлек N_  "" ;
әйләнә-тирә+N:әйләнә-тирә N_  "" ;
әрбәлек+N:әрбәлек N_  "" ;
әфсен+N:әфсен N_  "" ;
өзелгәнлек+N:өзелгәнлек N_  "" ;
өметсезлек+N:өметсезлек N_  "" ;
өткеч+N:өткеч N_  "" ;
